inc/flattened/createYaml/yaml_output/VTI_IND_TI2.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+0SgO: niwanitoosiinaadog
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+0SgO: giwanitoosiinaadog
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+0SgO: niwanitoosiiminaadog
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+0SgO: giwanitoosiiminaadog
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+0SgO: giwanitoosiinaawaadog
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+0SgO: owanitoosiinaadog
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+0SgO: owanitoosiinaawaadog
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+0SgO: owanitoosiininaadog
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+0PlO: niwanitoosiinaadogenan
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+0PlO: giwanitoosiinaadogenan
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+0PlO: niwanitoosiiminaadogenan
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+0PlO: giwanitoosiiminaadogenan
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+0PlO: giwanitoosiinaawaadogenan
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+0PlO: owanitoosiinaadogenan
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+0PlO: owanitoosiinaawaadogenan
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+0PlO: owanitoosiininaadogenan
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+0SgO: niwanitoonaadog
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+0SgO: giwanitoonaadog
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+0SgO: niwanitoominaadog
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+0SgO: giwanitoominaadog
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+0SgO: giwanitoonaawaadog
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+0SgO: owanitoonaadog
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+0SgO: owanitoonaawaadog
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+0SgO: owanitooninaadog
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+0PlO: niwanitoonaadogenan
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+0PlO: giwanitoonaadogenan
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+0PlO: niwanitoominaadogenan
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+0PlO: giwanitoominaadogenan
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+0PlO: giwanitoonaawaadogenan
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+0PlO: owanitoonaadogenan
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+0PlO: owanitoonaawaadogenan
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+0SgO: niwanitoosiinan
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+0SgO: giwanitoosiinan
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+0SgO: niwanitoosiimin
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+0SgO: giwanitoosiimin
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+0SgO: giwanitoosiinaawaan
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+0SgO: owanitoosiinan
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+0SgO: owanitoosiinaawaan
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+0SgO: [owanitoosiinini,owanitoosiini]
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+0PlO: niwanitoosiinan
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+0PlO: giwanitoosiinan
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+0PlO: niwanitoosiimin
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+0PlO: giwanitoosiimin
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+0PlO: giwanitoosiinaawaan
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+0PlO: owanitoosiinan
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+0PlO: owanitoosiinaawaan
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+0PlO: [owanitoosiinini,owanitoosiini]
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0SgO: niwanitoon
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0SgO: giwanitoon
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+0SgO: niwanitoomin
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+0SgO: giwanitoomin
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+0SgO: giwanitoonaawaa
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+0SgO: owanitoon
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+0SgO: owanitoonaawaa
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+0SgO: [owanitoonini,owanitooni]
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0PlO: niwanitoonan
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0PlO: giwanitoonan
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+0PlO: niwanitoomin
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+0PlO: giwanitoomin
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+0PlO: giwanitoonaawaan
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+0PlO: owanitoonan
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+0PlO: owanitoonaawaan
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+0PlO: [owanitoonini,owanitooni]
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+0SgO: niwanitoosiinaaban
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+0SgO: giwanitoosiinaaban
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+0SgO: niwanitoosiiminaaban
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+0SgO: giwanitoosiiminaaban
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+0SgO: giwanitoosiinaawaaban
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+0SgO: owanitoosiinaaban
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+0SgO: owanitoosiinaawaaban
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+0SgO: owanitoosiininaaban
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+0PlO: [niwanitoosiinaabaniin,niwanitoosiinaabanen]
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+0PlO: [giwanitoosiinaabaniin,giwanitoosiinaabanen]
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+0PlO: [niwanitoosiiminaabaniin,niwanitoosiiminaabanen]
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+0PlO: [giwanitoosiiminaabaniin,giwanitoosiiminaabanen]
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+0PlO: [giwanitoosiinaawaabaniin,giwanitoosiinaawaabanen]
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+0PlO: [owanitoosiinaabaniin,owanitoosiinaabanen]
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+0PlO: [owanitoosiinaawaabaniin,owanitoosiinaawaabanen]
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+0PlO: [owanitoosiinininaabaniin,owanitoosiinininaabanen]
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+0SgO: niwanitoonaaban
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+0SgO: giwanitoonaaban
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+0SgO: niwanitoominaaban
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+0SgO: giwanitoominaaban
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+0SgO: giwanitoonaawaaban
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+0SgO: owanitoonaaban
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+0SgO: owanitoonaawaaban
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv+0SgO: owanitooninaaban
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+0PlO: [niwanitoonaabaniin,niwanitoonaabanen]
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+0PlO: [giwanitoonaabaniin,giwanitoonaabanen]
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+0PlO: [niwanitoominaabaniin,niwanitoominaabanen]
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+0PlO: [giwanitoominaabaniin,giwanitoominaabanen]
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+0PlO: [giwanitoonaawaabaniin,giwanitoonaawaabanen]
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+0PlO: [owanitoonaabaniin,owanitoonaabanen]
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+0PlO: [owanitoonaawaabaniin,owanitoonaawaabanen]
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv+0PlO: [owanitooninaabaniin,owanitooninaabanen]
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+3SgProx+0SgO/0PlO: wanitoosiigoban
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+3PlProx+0SgO/0PlO: wanitoosiigwaaban
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+3SgObv+0SgO/0PlO: wanitoosiinigoban
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgProx+0SgO/0PlO: wanitoogoban
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+3PlProx+0SgO/0PlO: wanitoogwaaban
     wanitoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgObv+0SgO/0PlO: wanitoonigoban
